Louisiana, session 2026, SB5.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part I-B of Chapter 1 of Title 28, comprised of R.S. 28:16 and 17, is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART I-B. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE APPLICATIONS
RELATING TO MENTAL HEALTH
§16. Protections for users of mental health chatbots
A. As used in this Part, the following definitions shall apply:
(1)"Artificial intelligence" means an artificial system developed in
computer software, physical hardware, or other context that solves tasks
requiring human-like perception, cognition, planning, learning, communication,
or physical action.
Page 1 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-53 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 5
(2)(a) "Mental health chatbot" means an artificial intelligence
technology that:
(i) Uses a system that is trained on data and is designed to simulate
human conversation with a consumer through text, audio, or visual
communication.
(ii) Generates unscripted outputs similar to outputs created by a human,
with limited or no human oversight.
(iii) Engages in interactive conversations with a user of the mental health
chatbot similar to the confidential communications that an individual would
have with a licensed mental health provider.
(iv) Represents to a user or causes a reasonable person to believe that it
can or will provide mental health therapy or help a user manage or treat mental
health conditions.
(b)"Mental health chatbot" does not include artificial intelligence
technology that only provides scripted output, such as guided meditations or
mindfulness exercises, or analyzes an individual's input for the purpose of
connecting the individual with a human mental health provider.
(3) "Operator" means a person who makes a mental health chatbot
platform available to a user.
(4)"User" means an individual located in Louisiana at the time the
individual accesses or uses a mental health chatbot.
B. An operator of a mental health chatbot shall cause the chatbot to
clearly and conspicuously disclose to a user that the chatbot is an artificial
intelligence technology and not a human. The disclosure shall be made:
(1) Before the user may access the features of the mental health chatbot.
(2) At the beginning of any interaction with the user if the user has not
accessed the mental health chatbot within the previous seven days.
(3) Any time a user asks or otherwise prompts the mental health chatbot
about whether artificial intelligence is being used.
Page 2 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-53 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 5
C. An operator of a mental health chatbot shall have protocols in place
to address possible suicidal ideation, self-harm, or physical harm to others
expressed by the user, including referral to a crisis service provider such as a
suicide hotline.
D.(1) An operator of a mental health chatbot may not sell to or share
with any third party any individually identifiable health information of a user
or the user's input. This Subsection shall not apply to individually identifiable
health information that is requested by a healthcare provider with the consent
of the user, provided to a health plan of a user upon request of the user, or
shared to ensure the effective functionality of the mental health chatbot with
another party with which the operator has a contract related to such
functionality.
(2) When sharing information pursuant to this Subsection, the operator
and the other entity shall comply with all applicable privacy and security
provisions of 45 CFR Part 160 and 45 CFR Part 164, Subparts A and E, as if the
operator were a covered entity and the other entity were a business associate,
as such terms are defined in 45 CFR 160.103.
E. An operator may not use a mental health chatbot to advertise a
specific product or service to a user in a conversation between the user and the
mental health chatbot unless the chatbot clearly and conspicuously identifies the
advertisement as an advertisement and discloses to the user any sponsorship,
business affiliation, or agreement that the operator has with a third party to
promote, advertise, or recommend the product or service.
F. An operator of a mental health chatbot may not use a user's input to:
(1) Determine whether to display an advertisement for a product or
service to the user, unless the advertisement is for the mental health chatbot
itself.
(2) Determine a product, service, or category of product or service, to
advertise to the user.
Page 3 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-53 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 5
(3) Customize how an advertisement is presented to the user.
G. The provisions of this Section shall not prohibit a mental health
chatbot from recommending that a user seek counseling, therapy, or other
assistance from a licensed healthcare professional.
§17. Violations; enforcement authority
A. The attorney general may bring a civil action to enforce any violations
of this Part.
B. An operator that violates the provisions of this Part shall be subject
to a civil fine of up to ten thousand dollars per violation.
C.(1) At least forty-five days before the day on which the attorney
general initiates an enforcement action against an operator who is subject to the
requirements of this Part, the attorney general shall provide the operator with
a written notice that identifies each alleged violation and an explanation of the
basis for each allegation.
(2) Except as provided in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection, the attorney
general shall not initiate an action if the operator cures the notice violation
within forty-five days after the date on which the operator receives the notice
by providing the attorney general with a written statement indicating that the
violation is cured and no further violations will occur.
(3) The attorney general may initiate a civil action against an operator
who does either of the following:
(a) Fails to cure a violation after receiving the written notice provided for
in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection.
(b) Commits another violation of the same provision after curing a
violation and providing a written statement in accordance with Paragraph (2)
of this Subsection.
(4) If a court of competent jurisdiction grants judgment or injunctive
relief to the attorney general, the court shall award the attorney general
reasonable attorney fees, court costs, and investigative costs.
Page 4 of 6
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-53 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 5
(5) A person who violates an administrative order or court order issued
for a violation of this Part shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than
five thousand dollars for each violation. A civil penalty in accordance with this
Section may be imposed in any civil action brought by the attorney general.
(6) All monies received from the payment of a fine or civil penalty
imposed and collected pursuant to the provisions of this Section shall be used
by the attorney general for consumer protection enforcement efforts or to
promote consumer protection and education.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.